Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [469.208] MEDICAL ENTERPRISE ZONE. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, "medical enterprise zone" means a designated area within the state in which targeted tax incentives may be used for infrastructure and economic development costs for the purpose of medical development, technology, and medical manufacturing. new text end new text begin (b) The city of Sartell is designated as a medical enterprise zone. The city council of Sartell shall designate a geographic area within the city that will allow the city to collect newly established corporate taxes, individual income taxes, and state commercial-industrial property taxes that may be used exclusively for purposes of medical enterprise. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DESTINATION MEDICAL CENTER COMMUNITY.new text end new text begin The city of Sartell is designated a Destination Medical Center Community. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end